Hawaii statutes.
[§431N-5] Rulemaking authority.
The director of health shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 which
are necessary to carry out this chapter. The rules shall include, but need not
be limited to:

(1) Establishment of guidelines for the purchase of
health care coverage from health care contractors by the department;

(2) Establishment of specific health care services to
be covered, limited, and excluded by the program, including preventive
services, outreach, and education strategies designed to reach gap group
individuals;

(3) Establishment of eligibility requirements for
participation in the program;

(4) Development and implementation of an
identification and notification process for eligible program participants;

(5) Establishment of a payment schedule based on the
person's ability to pay;

(6) Establishment of program participation criteria
for health care contractors;

(7) Establishment of monitoring and evaluative
guidelines for the program;

(8) Establishment of appeal procedures for denial of
eligibility, disqualification from program participation, assessment of civil
penalties, or other negative action; and

(9) Establishment of procedures to exclude or remove
from the program persons who drop individual or group coverage to obtain insurance.
[L 1989, c 378, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next